Utah statutes.
23-27-401.   Rulemaking authority.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board may make rules that:

(1)  establish the procedures and requirements for decontaminating a conveyance or equipment to prevent the introduction and infestation of a Dreissena mussel;

(2)  establish the requirements necessary to provide proof that a conveyance or equipment is decontaminated;

(3)  establish the notification procedures required in Section 23-27-303;

(4)  identify the geographic area, water body, facility, or water supply system that is infested by Dreissena mussels;

(5)  establish a procedure and protocol in cooperation with the Department of Transportation for stopping, inspecting, detaining, and decontaminating a conveyance or equipment at a port-of-entry in accordance with Section 23-27-301; and

(6)  are necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 284, 2008 General Session

